Washington statutes.
RCW 43.143.020

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter:

(1) "Coastal counties" means Clallam, Jefferson, Grays Harbor, and Pacific counties.

(2) "Coastal waters" means the waters of the Pacific Ocean seaward from Cape Flattery south to Cape Disappointment, from mean high tide seaward two hundred miles.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 2 s 10.]